Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Revenue, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 32,733,434
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 19,253,100
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 57,990,776
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 21,733,761
(5) Collections Division................... $ 32,829,626
(6) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 44,987,081
(7) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 6,695,900
(8) Nonprofit housing program....... $ 3,492,972
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 8,422,461
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 45,580,451
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 1,303,758
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 12,740,071
(5) Collections Division................... $ 17,382,758
(6) Corporate Division .................... $ 15,914,108
(7) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 7,403,509
(8) Marijuana program ................... $ 4,926,318
Enrolled Senate Bill 5537 (SB 5537-A) Page 1
(9) Senior Property Tax
Deferral program ...................... $ 35,426,437
(10) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 550,120
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5537 (SB 5537-A) Page 2